Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6041
Department; adopt rules and regulations.

To protect the health, safety, and welfare of nursing home residents and the public, the department shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary for the effective administration of sections 71-6038 to 71-6042. Such rules and regulations shall be consistent with federal requirements developed by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1983, LB 273, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 150;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 751;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 113;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1238.